Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,124
Approval or abandonment of merger or consolidation by members of constituent limited cooperative association.

(1) Unless the articles of organization or bylaws provide for a greater quorum and subject to section 21-2939, a plan of merger or consolidation shall be approved by at least a two-thirds vote of patron members voting under section 21-2939 and by at least a two-thirds vote of investor members, if any, voting under section 21-2942.

(2) Subject to any contractual rights, after a merger or consolidation is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under section 21-29,126, a constituent limited cooperative association may amend the plan of merger or consolidation or abandon the planned merger or consolidation:

(a) As provided in the plan; and

(b) Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 124;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 30.